Illinois, session 104th, SB2311.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Flood Control Act of 1945 is amended by 5adding Sections 5.1, 5.2, 5.3, and 5.4 as follows: 6    (615 ILCS 15/5.1 new)7    Sec. 5.1. State flood plan. 8    (a) Not later than July 1, 2026, and before the end of each 9successive 5-year period after that date, the Department of 10Natural Resources shall prepare and adopt a comprehensive 11State flood plan that incorporates the regional flood plans 12approved under Section 5.2. The State flood plan must:13        (1) provide for orderly preparation for and response 14    to flood conditions to protect against the loss of life 15    and property; 16        (2) be a guide to State and local flood control 17    policy; and 18        (3) contribute to water development where possible. 19    (b) The State flood plan must include:20        (1) an evaluation of the condition and adequacy of 21    flood control infrastructure on a regional basis; 22        (2) a statewide, ranked list of ongoing and proposed 23    flood control and mitigation projects and strategies   SB2311- 2 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1    necessary to protect against the loss of life and property 2    from flooding and a discussion of how those projects and 3    strategies might further water development, where 4    applicable; 5        (3) an analysis of completed, ongoing, and proposed 6    flood control projects included in previous State flood 7    plans, including which projects received funding; 8        (4) an analysis of development in the 100-year 9    floodplain areas as defined by the federal Emergency 10    Management Agency; and11        (5) legislative recommendations the Department of 12    Natural Resources considers necessary to facilitate flood 13    control planning and project construction. 14    (c) The Department of Natural Resources, in coordination 15with the Department of Agriculture and the Illinois Emergency 16Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, shall adopt 17guidance principles for the State flood plan that reflect the 18public interest of the entire State. The Department of Natural 19Resources shall review and revise the guidance principles, 20with input from the Department of Agriculture and the Illinois 21Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, 22as necessary and at least every fifth year to coincide with the 235-year cycle for adoption of a new State flood plan.24    (d) On adoption of a State flood plan, the Department of 25Natural Resources shall deliver the plan to the Governor and 26the General Assembly.  SB2311- 3 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1    (e) Not later than July 1, 2026, the Department of Natural 2Resources shall adopt guidance principles for the regional 3flood plans and designate flood planning regions corresponding 4to each river basin. 5    (615 ILCS 15/5.2 new)6    Sec. 5.2. Regional flood planning. 7    (a) The Department of Natural Resources shall:8        (1) designate flood planning regions corresponding to 9    each river basin;10        (2) provide technical and financial assistance to the 11    flood planning groups; and12        (3) adopt guidance principles for the regional flood 13    plans, including procedures for amending adopted plans.14    (b) In designating flood planning regions, the Department 15of Natural Resources may divide river basins to avoid having 16an impracticably large area for efficient planning in a flood 17planning region.18    (c) The Department of Natural Resources shall designate 19representatives from each flood planning region to serve as 20the initial flood planning group. The initial flood planning 21group may then designate additional representatives to serve 22on the flood planning group. The initial flood planning group 23shall designate additional representatives if necessary to 24ensure adequate representation from the interests in its 25region, including the public, counties, municipalities,   SB2311- 4 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1industries, agricultural interests, environmental interests, 2small businesses, electric generating utilities, river 3authorities, water districts, and water utilities. The flood 4planning group shall maintain adequate representation from 5those interests. In addition, the Department of Natural 6Resources, the Department of Agriculture, and the Illinois 7Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security 8each shall appoint a representative to serve as an ex officio 9member of each flood planning group.10    (d) Each regional flood planning group shall hold public 11meetings as provided by Department of Natural Resources rule 12to gather from interested persons, including members of the 13public and other political subdivisions located in that 14county, suggestions and recommendations as to issues, 15provisions, projects, and strategies that should be considered 16for inclusion in a regional flood plan.17    (e) Each flood planning group shall consider the 18information collected under subsection (d) in creating a 19regional flood plan. A regional flood plan must:20        (1) use information based on scientific data and 21    updated mapping; and22        (2) include:23            (A) a general description of the condition and 24        functionality of flood control infrastructure in the 25        flood planning region;26            (B) flood control projects under construction or   SB2311- 5 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1        in the planning stage;2            (C) information on land use changes and population 3        growth in the flood planning region;4            (D) an identification of the areas in the flood 5        planning region that are prone to flood and flood 6        control solutions for those areas; and7            (E) an indication of whether a particular flood 8        control solution:9                (i) meets an emergency need;10                (ii) uses federal money as a funding 11            component; and12                (iii) may also serve as a water supply source.13    (f) After a flood planning group prepares a regional flood 14plan, the group shall hold at least one public meeting in a 15central location in the flood planning region to accept 16comments on the regional flood plan. The flood planning group 17shall:18        (1) cooperate with the Department of Natural Resources 19    to determine what method of providing notice for the 20    public meeting is most accessible to persons in the flood 21    planning region; and22        (2) publish, post, or otherwise disseminate notice of 23    the public meeting according to the method described by 24    paragraph (1).25    (g) The notice published, posted, or otherwise 26disseminated under subsection (f) must contain:  SB2311- 6 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1        (1) the date, time, and location of the public meeting 2    or hearing;3        (2) a summary of the regional flood plan;4        (3) the name, telephone number, and address of a 5    person to whom questions or requests for additional 6    information may be submitted; and7        (4) information on how the public may submit comments.8    (h) After consideration of the comments received at the 9public meeting, the flood planning group shall adopt the 10regional flood plan and submit the adopted regional flood plan 11to the Department of Natural Resources. The Department of 12Natural Resources shall make a determination whether the 13regional flood plan:14        (1) satisfies the requirements for regional flood 15    plans adopted in the guidance principles described by 16    subsection (a);17        (2) adequately provides for the preservation of life 18    and property and the development of water supply sources, 19    where applicable; and20        (3) affects a neighboring area.21    (i) If the Department of Natural Resources makes a 22determination that an element of a regional flood plan 23negatively affects a neighboring area, the Department of 24Natural Resources must coordinate with the affected area to 25adjust the plan to ensure that no neighboring area is 26negatively affected by the plan.  SB2311- 7 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1    (j) The Department of Natural Resources shall approve a 2regional flood plan when it:3        (1) satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (1) and 4    (2) of subsection (h); and5        (2) does not negatively affect a neighboring area.6    (k) A flood planning group may amend a regional flood plan 7after the plan has been approved by the Department of Natural 8Resources according to rules adopted by the Department of 9Natural Resources.10    (l) Not later than July 1, 2027, each flood planning group 11shall submit a regional flood plan to the Department of 12Natural Resources for the group's flood planning region. 13    (615 ILCS 15/5.3 new)14    Sec. 5.3. Ten-year dam repair and maintenance plan; 15reports. 16    (a) In this Section, "plan" means the 10-year dam repair, 17rehabilitation, and maintenance plan adopted under this 18Section.19    (b) The Department of Natural Resources shall prepare and 20adopt a plan describing the repair and maintenance needs of 21flood control dams and prepare and adopt a new plan before the 22end of the 10th year following the adoption of a plan.23    (c) The Department of Natural Resources shall prepare a 24report of the repair and maintenance needs of all dams that:25        (1) are not licensed by the federal Energy Regulatory   SB2311- 8 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1    Commission;2        (2) do not have flood storage;3        (3) are required to pass floodwaters; and4        (4) have failed.5    (d) Each year, the Department of Natural Resources shall 6deliver to the General Assembly a report regarding progress 7made on items listed in the plan. If an update to the report or 8plan is necessary before the yearly report or before the end of 9the 10-year cycle, the Department of Natural Resources must 10deliver to the General Assembly an amended report or plan. 11    (615 ILCS 15/5.4 new)12    Sec. 5.4. State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory 13Committee. 14    (a) The State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory Committee 15is composed of the following members:16        (1) one member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate 17    President;18        (2) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 19    Minority Leader of the Senate;20        (3) one member of the House of Representatives, 21    appointed by the Speaker of the House;22        (4) one member of the House of Representatives, 23    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House;24        (5) a representative of the Illinois Emergency 25    Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, chosen   SB2311- 9 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1    by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 2    Homeland Security; and3        (6) a representative of the Department of Natural 4    Resources, chosen by the Department of Natural Resources.5    (b) The member of the Senate appointed by the Senate 6President and the member of the House of Representatives 7appointed by the Speaker of the House shall serve as the 8co-chairs of the State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory 9Committee.10    (c) The State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory Committee 11may hold public hearings, formal meetings, or work sessions. 12The State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory Committee may not 13take formal action at a public hearing, formal meeting, or 14work session unless a quorum of the State Flood Plan 15Implementation Advisory Committee is present.16    (d) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, a 17member of the State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory 18Committee is not entitled to receive compensation for service 19on the State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory Committee or 20reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of 21official duties as a member of the State Flood Plan 22Implementation Advisory Committee. Service on the State Flood 23Plan Implementation Advisory Committee by a member of the 24Senate or House of Representatives is considered legislative 25service for which the member is entitled to reimbursement and 26other benefits in the same manner and to the same extent as for   SB2311- 10 -LRB104 07197 LNS 17234 b1other legislative service.2    (e) The State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory Committee 3shall review the overall operation, function, and structure of 4the State flood plan and rules adopted by the Department of 5Natural Resources to implement the State flood plan at least 6semiannually and may provide comments and recommendations to 7the Department of Natural Resources on any matter.8    (f) The State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory Committee 9may adopt rules, procedures, and policies as needed to 10administer this Section and implement its responsibilities.11    (g) The State Flood Plan Implementation Advisory Committee 12shall make recommendations to the Department of Natural 13Resources regarding information to be posted on the Department 14of Natural Resources' website.